Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2502.01
Chief executive officer, defined.

Chief executive officer means the mayor, the city manager, or the chairperson of the board of trustees of a municipality.

Laws 2021, LB163, § 166.